Georgia, session 2025_26, HB382.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 16-13-25 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to Schedule I
controlled substances, is amended by revising subparagraph (N) of paragraph (3) as follows:
"(N) Psilocybin. Such term does not include drugs containing crystalline polymorph
psilocybin that are approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration under
Section 505 of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, which drug shall be
scheduled in accordance with its scheduling by the United States Drug Enforcement
Administration and listing in the federal Controlled Substances Act, 21 U.S.C.
Section 812. Nothing in this subparagraph shall abrogate or otherwise affect any power
of the Board of Pharmacy, including any emergency power, under any other applicable
provisions of law;"
H. B. 382 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 33 9807S
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 382 (SUB)
- 2 -